Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Time for filing. An individual must file a statement of economic interest: (1) within 60 days of accepting employment as a public official deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end a local official in a metropolitan governmental unitnew text begin ; or, regardless of geographic location, a local official in a city of the first, second, or third class, as provided in section 410.01new text end ; (2) within 60 days of assuming office as a district court judge, appeals court judge, supreme court justice, or county commissioner; (3) within 14 days after filing an affidavit of candidacy or petition to appear on the ballot for an elective state constitutional or legislative office or an elective local office in a metropolitan governmental unit other than county commissioner; (4) in the case of a public official requiring the advice and consent of the senate, within 14 days after undertaking the duties of office; or (5) in the case of members of the Minnesota Racing Commission, the director of the Minnesota Racing Commission, chief of security, medical officer, inspector of pari-mutuels, and stewards employed or approved by the commission or persons who fulfill those duties under contract, within 60 days of accepting or assuming duties.